Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
ARTICLE 5 COLORADO REVISED STATUTES
2-5-125. Supplements and replacement volumes to Colorado Revised Statutes - report - enactment - publication - effective date.

The following supplements and replacement volumes to Colorado Revised Statutes, originally entitled Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, as corrected, collated, edited, revised, and compiled by the revisor and as certified by the committee on legal services, are prepared and published pursuant to and in conformity with section 2-5-117:

1975 supplement. The 1975 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the forty-ninth general assembly at its second regular session (1974) and by the fiftieth general assembly at its first regular session (1975), a copy of which, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted. The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes 1973.

1976 supplement. The 1976 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the forty-ninth general assembly at its second regular session (1974), by the fiftieth general assembly at its first regular session (1975), and by the fiftieth general assembly at its second regular session and its first extraordinary session (1976), a copy of which, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted. The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes 1973.

1977 supplement. The 1977 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services" (consisting of a computer printout), contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the forty-ninth general assembly at its second regular session (1974), by the fiftieth general assembly at its first regular session (1975), by the fiftieth general assembly at its second regular session and its first extraordinary session (1976), and by the fifty-first general assembly at its first regular session (1977), a computer printout of which, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly, and is approved and adopted. The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes 1973.

The 1977 supplement shall not be published separately in pocket parts or in a single bound volume but shall be compiled and published with the 1978 supplement.

1978 supplement. The 1978 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the forty-ninth general assembly at its second regular session in 1974, by the fiftieth general assembly at its first regular session in 1975, by the fiftieth general assembly at its second regular session and its first extraordinary session in 1976, by the fifty-first general assembly at its first regular session in 1977, and by the fifty-first general assembly at its second regular session, its first extraordinary session, and its second extraordinary session in 1978 (with the exception of Volume 12, 1978 supplement, which contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-first general assembly at its first regular session in 1977 and by the fifty-first general assembly at its second regular session, its first extraordinary session, and its second extraordinary session in 1978). A copy of said supplement, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

Volumes 5 and 8, 1978 replacement volumes. Volumes 5 and 8, 1978 replacement volumes, including the 1978 supplement to each volume, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado as title 12 and titles 16 to 21 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, together with the 1975 and 1976 supplements thereto, the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services" enacting the 1977 supplement thereto (which was not published), and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-first general assembly at its second regular session, its first extraordinary session, and its second extraordinary session in 1978. A copy of said volumes and supplements, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes 1973.

1979 supplement. The 1979 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature (except for the laws contained in the replacement volumes for volumes 5, 8, and 12) enacted during the 1974, 1975, 1976, 1977, 1978, and 1979 sessions of the Colorado general assembly.

A copy of said supplement, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes 1973.

1980 supplement. The 1980 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature (except for the laws contained in the replacement volumes for volumes 1B, 5, 8, and 12) enacted during the 1974, 1975, 1976, 1977, 1978, 1979, and 1980 sessions of the Colorado general assembly.

Volume 1B, 1980 replacement volume. Volume 1B, 1980 replacement volume, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for titles 1 to 3 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, together with the 1979 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-second general assembly at its second regular session in 1980.

A copy of said supplement and replacement volume, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes 1973.

1981 supplement. The 1981 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature (except for the laws contained in the replacement volumes for volumes 1B, 5, 8, and 12) enacted during the 1974, 1975, 1976, 1977, 1978, 1979, 1980, and 1981 sessions of the Colorado general assembly.

A copy of said supplement, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes 1973.

1982 supplement. The 1982 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature (except for the laws contained in the replacement volumes for volumes 1B, 5, 8, 10, 11, 12, 16A, and 16B) enacted during the 1974, 1975, 1976, 1977, 1978, 1979, 1980, 1981, and 1982 sessions of the Colorado general assembly.

Volumes 10, 11, 16A, and 16B, 1982 replacement volumes. Volumes 10, 11, 16A, and 16B, 1982 replacement volumes, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for titles 24 to 28, 38, and 39 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, together with the 1981 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-third general assembly at its second regular session in 1982.

A copy of said supplement and replacement volumes, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes 1973.

1983 supplement. The 1983 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature (except for the laws contained in the replacement volumes for volumes 1B, 5, 8, 10, 11, 12, 16A, and 16B) enacted during the 1974, 1975, 1976, 1977, 1978, 1979, 1980, 1981, 1982, and 1983 sessions of the Colorado general assembly.

A copy of said supplement, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1984 supplement. The 1984 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature (except for the laws contained in the replacement volumes for volumes 1B, 5, 8, 10, 11, 12, 14, 16A, 16B, and 17) enacted during the 1974, 1975, 1976, 1977, 1978, 1979, 1980, 1981, 1982, 1983, and 1984 sessions of the Colorado general assembly.
(j) (I) (A) 1984 supplement. The 1984 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature (except for the laws contained in the replacement volumes for volumes 1B, 5, 8, 10, 11, 12, 14, 16A, 16B, and 17) enacted during the 1974, 1975, 1976, 1977, 1978, 1979, 1980, 1981, 1982, 1983, and 1984 sessions of the Colorado general assembly.

Special supplement. That portion of the publication entitled "Special Supplement 1984 Voter-approved Changes and Court Rules Update", hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains the law amending title 1, C.R.S., in volume 1B, as enacted by the people at the general election on November 6, 1984.

Volumes 14 and 17, 1984 replacement volumes. Volumes 14 and 17, 1984 replacement volumes, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for titles 33 to 35 and 40 to 43 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, together with the 1983 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-fourth general assembly at its second regular session in 1984.

A copy of said 1984 supplement and portion of the special supplement and replacement volumes, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1985 supplement. The 1985 supplement, including the addendum to the 1985 supplement for volume 10, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature (except for the laws contained in the replacement volumes for volumes 1B, 5, 8, 10, 11, 12, 14, 16A, 16B, and 17) enacted during the 1974, 1975, 1976, 1977, 1978, 1979, 1980, 1981, 1982, 1983, 1984, and 1985 regular sessions of the Colorado general assembly and during the extraordinary sessions in 1976, 1978, and 1985.

Volume 5, 1985 replacement volume. Volume 5, 1985 replacement volume, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for title 12 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 and in volume 5, 1978 replacement volume, together with the 1984 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-fifth general assembly at its first regular session in 1985 pertaining thereto.

A copy of said supplement and replacement volume, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1986 supplement. The 1986 supplement, including the 1986 special supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature (except for the laws contained in the bound replacement volumes for volumes 1B, 3A, 3B, 5, 8A, 8B, 10, 11, 12A, 12B, 14, 16A, 16B, and 17) enacted during the 1974, 1975, 1976, 1977, 1978, 1979, 1980, 1981, 1982, 1983, 1984, 1985, and 1986 regular sessions of the Colorado general assembly and during the extraordinary sessions in 1976, 1978, 1985, and 1986.

Volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B, 1986 replacement volumes. Volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B, 1986 replacement volumes, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for titles 7 to 9, 16 to 21, and 29 to 31 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 and in volume 8, 1978 replacement volume, and volume 12, 1977 replacement volume, together with the 1985 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-fifth general assembly at its second regular session in 1986 pertaining thereto. Additionally, volume 8B, 1986 replacement volume, specifically includes the errata sheet for page 223 which correctly reflects the amendments made to section 18-4-401, C.R.S.

A copy of said supplement and replacement volumes, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said official report of the committee on legal services, is enacted as the positive and statutory law of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1987 supplement. The 1987 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains:

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1973 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 2, 9, 13, and 15;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1980 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 1B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1982 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 10, 11, 16A, and 16B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1984 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 14 and 17;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1985 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 5;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1986 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B.

Volumes 4A, 4B, 6A, and 6B, 1987 replacement volumes. Volumes 4A, 4B, 6A, and 6B, 1987 replacement volumes, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for titles 10, 11, and 13 to 15 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, together with the 1986 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-sixth general assembly at its first regular session in 1987 pertaining thereto.

A copy of said supplement and replacement volumes, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", is enacted as the positive and statutory law of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1988 supplement. The 1988 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains:

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1973 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 2, 13, and 15;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1980 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 1B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1982 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 11, 16A, and 16B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1984 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 14 and 17;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1985 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 5;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1986 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1987 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4A, 4B, 6A, and 6B.

Volumes 9, 10A, and 10B, 1988 replacement volumes. Volumes 9, 10A, and 10B, 1988 replacement volumes, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for titles 22 and 23 and title 24 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, and in volume 10, 1982 replacement volume, together with the 1987 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-sixth general assembly at its second regular session and its first extraordinary session in 1988 pertaining thereto.

A copy of said supplement and replacement volumes, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", is enacted as the positive and statutory law of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1989 supplement. The 1989 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains:

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1973 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 2, 13, and 15;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1980 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 1B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1982 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 16A and 16B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1984 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 14 and 17;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1985 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 5;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1986 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1987 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4A, 4B, 6A, and 6B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1988 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 9, 10A, and 10B.

Volumes 11A and 11B, 1989 replacement volumes. Volumes 11A and 11B, 1989 replacement volumes, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for title 25 and titles 26 to 28 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, and in volume 11, 1982 replacement volume, together with the 1988 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-seventh general assembly at its first regular session and its first extraordinary session in 1989 pertaining thereto.

A copy of said supplement and replacement volumes, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", is enacted as the positive and statutory law of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1990 supplement. The 1990 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains:

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1973 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 2 and 13;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1980 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 1B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1982 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 16A and 16B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1984 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 14 and 17;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1985 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 5;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1986 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1987 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4A, 4B, 6A, and 6B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1988 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 9, 10A, and 10B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1989 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 11A and 11B.

Volume 15, 1990 replacement volume. Volume 15, 1990 replacement volume, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for titles 36 and 37 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, together with the 1989 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-seventh general assembly at its second regular session in 1990 pertaining thereto.

A copy of said supplement and replacement volume, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", is enacted as the positive and statutory law of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1991 supplement and 1991 special supplement. The 1991 supplement and the 1991 special supplement (resulting from the second extraordinary session), hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain:

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1973 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 2 and 13;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1980 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 1B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1982 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 16A and 16B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1984 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 14 and 17;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1986 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1987 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4A, 4B, 6A, and 6B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1988 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 9, 10A, and 10B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1989 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 11A and 11B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1990 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 15;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1991 first extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 5A and 5B.

Volumes 5A and 5B, 1991 replacement volumes. Volumes 5A and 5B, 1991 replacement volumes, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for title 12 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, in volume 5, 1978 replacement volume, and in volume 5, 1985 replacement volume, together with the 1990 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-eighth general assembly at its first regular session and its first extraordinary session in 1991 pertaining thereto.

A copy of said supplements and replacement volumes, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", is enacted as the positive and statutory law of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1992 supplement. The 1992 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains:

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1973 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 13;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1980 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 1B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1982 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 16A and 16B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1984 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 14 and 17;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1986 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1987 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4A, 4B, 6A, and 6B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1988 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 9, 10A, and 10B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1989 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 11A and 11B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1990 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 15;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1991 first extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 5A and 5B.

Volume 2, 1992 replacement volume. Volume 2, 1992 replacement volume, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for titles 4 to 6 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 together with the 1991 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-eighth general assembly at its second regular session in 1992 pertaining thereto.

A copy of said supplements and replacement volume, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", is enacted as the positive and statutory law of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1993 supplement. The 1993 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains:

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1973 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 13;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1980 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 1B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1982 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 16A and 16B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1984 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 14;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1986 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1987 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4A, 4B, 6A, and 6B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1988 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 9, 10A, and 10B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1989 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 11A and 11B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1990 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 15;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1991 first extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 5A and 5B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1992 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 2.

Volume 17, 1993 replacement volume. Volume 17, 1993 replacement volume, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for titles 40 to 43 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 together with the 1992 supplement thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-ninth general assembly at its first regular session in 1993 pertaining thereto.

A copy of said supplements and replacement volume, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", is enacted as the positive and statutory law of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1994 supplement. The 1994 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains:

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1973 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 13;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1980 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 1B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1982 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 16A;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1984 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 14;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1986 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1987 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4B, 6A, and 6B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1988 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 9, 10A, and 10B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1989 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 11A and 11B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1990 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 15;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1991 first extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 5A and 5B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1992 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 2;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1993 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 17.

Volumes 4A and 16B, 1994 replacement volumes. Volumes 4A and 16B, 1994 replacement volumes, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for title 10 which was revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, and in volume 4A, 1987 replacement volume, and for title 39 which was revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, and in volume 16B, 1982 replacement volume, together with the 1993 supplements thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the fifty-ninth general assembly at its second regular session in 1994 pertaining thereto.

A copy of said supplements and replacement volumes together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", is enacted as the positive and statutory law of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1995 supplement. The 1995 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains:
